Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5682
Rural Behavioral Health Training and Placement Program; created.

The Rural Behavioral Health Training and Placement Program is created and shall be administered by the Munroe-Meyer Institute at the University of Nebraska Medical Center. The program shall address behavioral health professional shortages in rural areas by:

(1) Offering service learning opportunities for behavioral health professionals to provide integrated mental health services in rural areas;

(2) Educating physicians to integrate behavioral health into primary care practice;

(3) Providing outreach clinical training opportunities in rural areas for interns, fellows, and graduate students from public and private universities and colleges in Nebraska that offer behavioral health graduate education; and

(4) Placing program graduates in primary care practices for the purpose of providing behavioral health patient visits.

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 40.